New Jersey, session 221, S3955.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. As used in this act: 2[1Affliation means a relationship where one party, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, the other party.1]2 Recovery residence means 2[housing with a home-like atmosphere, which is available in either a professionally-managed facility or a peer-managed facility, and] a boarding house licensed by the Department of Community Affairs2 which provides a sober living environment and alcohol- and drug-free living accommodations to individuals with substance use disorders, or to individuals with co-occurring mental health and substance use disorders, but which does not provide clinical treatment services for mental health or substance use disorders. 2[Recovery residence includes, but is not limited to, a facility that is commonly referred to as a sober living home.]2 Treatment provider means a facility licensed in accordance with section 8 of P.L.1975, c.305 (C.26:2B-14) for substance use disorder treatment or services, 2or2 a substance use disorder treatment facility issued a certificate of approval pursuant to P.L.1970, c.334 (C.26:2G-21 et seq.)2[, or a recovery residence located within the State]2. 2. Any marketing or advertising materials published or disseminated by a treatment provider 2or a recovery residence2 shall provide accurate and complete information, in plain language, and shall include 2[the following]2: a. information on the types and methods of services provided; b. information about the location in which services are provided; and c. the treatment providers 2or recovery residences2 name and brand name 1, phone number, mailing address, and business location address1 . 3. a.  It shall be an unlawful practice, pursuant to P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.), for a treatment provider 2or a recovery residence, as applicable,2 to: (1) make a false or misleading statement about the treatment providers 2or recovery residences2 status as an in-network or out-of-network provider; (2) provide, or direct any other person or entity to provide, false or misleading information about the identity of, or contact information for, any treatment provider 2or recovery residence2; (3) include false or misleading information about the Internet address of any treatment providers 2or recovery residences2 website, or to surreptitiously direct or redirect a person to another website; (4) suggest or imply that 1[a relationship] an 2[affliation1] affiliation2 with another treatment provider 2or recovery residence2 exists, unless the other treatment provider 2or recovery residence2 has provided express, written consent to indicate that 1[relationship] affiliation1; (5) make a false or misleading statement about the substance use disorder treatment services the treatment provider 2or recovery residence2 provides; or (6) make a false or misleading statement about the geographic location of the treatment provider 2or recovery residence,2 or the geographic location in which the treatment provider 2or recovery residence2 provides substance use disorder treatment services. b. Any treatment provider 2[who] or recovery residence which2 violates the provisions of subsection a. of this section shall be liable to a civil penalty of not more than $20,000 for each violation.  The civil penalty shall be collected pursuant to the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.), in a summary proceeding before the municipal court having jurisdiction. c. 2[Any] A2 person who suffers any injury or damages, including, but not limited to, paying for services that were performed in violation of this act, as a result of the use or employment by a treatment provider 2or recovery residence2 of any method, act, or practice declared unlawful under this act may bring an action or assert a counterclaim therefor in any court of competent jurisdiction.  In any action under this subsection, the court shall, in addition to any appropriate legal or equitable relief, award threefold the damages sustained by any person in interest.  In all actions under this section, the court shall also award reasonable attorney's fees, filing fees, and reasonable costs of suit. d. 2(1)2 The Office of Licensing in the Department of Health may investigate 2treatment providers for2 alleged violations of this act.  Upon finding a violation, the 2[division] Department of Health2 may suspend or revoke the treatment providers license or certification, if applicable, or may impose a civil penalty against the treatment provider.  If the 2[department] Department of Health2 imposes a civil penalty, the civil penalty shall be not more than $20,000 for each violation. 2(2) The Department of Community Affairs may investigate recovery residences for alleged violations of this act.  Upon finding a violation, the Department of Community Affairs may suspend or revoke the recovery residence owners license or certification, if applicable, or may impose a civil penalty against the recovery residence owner.  If the Department of Community Affairs imposes a civil penalty, the civil penalty shall be not more than $20,000 for each violation.2 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.